Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1458HV (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 771 Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 69. Develop and administer a purple 3 star school initiative that recognizes applicant schools in 4 this state that have demonstrated a commitment to supporting 5 military-connected students and the families of such students 6 with the goal of increasing the amount of support that schools 7 in this state make available to military-connected students and 8 the families of such students. 9